North Carolina, session 2025, HB962.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of twenty-five million dollars
($25,000,000) in nonrecurring funds to be allocated to East Carolina University for the College
of Engineering and Technology. These funds shall be used at the College for improvements to
buildings and to purchase and refurbish equipment.
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of four million dollars ($4,000,000) in
recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be allocated to East Carolina
University to expand positions at the College of Engineering and Technology.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H962-v-1*